Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 95. Small Business Loans.

Secs. 45.95.010 — 45.95.020.
[Renumbered as AS 45.81.200 — 45.81.210.]

Sec. 45.95.030.
Sale or transfer of preferred commercial paper. [Repealed, § 33 ch 141 SLA 1988.]

Sec. 45.95.040.
[Renumbered as AS 45.81.220.]

Sec. 45.95.050.
Power of commissioner to assign and sell mortgages. [Repealed, § 69 ch 21 SLA 1985.]

Secs. 45.95.055 — 45.95.080.
[Renumbered as AS 45.81.230 — 45.81.290.]